South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5161.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-6-1140 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (15) one hundred percent of retirement income received from working as a 911 professional. SECTION 2.  Chapter 47, Title 23 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 23-47-85.  A 911 professional is a first responder entitled to all benefits that accrue to first responders employed by the State and its local governing bodies. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----